Utah statutes.
13-40-302.   Other prohibited conduct.
A person who is not an owner or operator of a computer may not, with regard to
the computer:
(1)  induce an owner or operator to install a computer software component onto
the owner's or the operator's computer by intentionally misrepresenting that
installing the computer software is necessary for security or privacy reasons
or in order to open, view, or play a particular type of content; or
(2)  use intentionally deceptive means to cause the execution of a computer
software component with the intent of causing the computer to use the computer
software component in a manner that violates any other provision of this
chapter.
